District of Columbia statutes.
15-711

Deposit or security for costs in Superior Court.

Nonresidents of the District of Columbia may commence suits in the Superior Court of the District of Columbia without first giving security for costs, but upon motion may be required to give security pursuant to section 15-703 .

History

Dec. 23, 1963, 77 Stat. 535, Pub. L. 88-241, § 1
July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 554, Pub. L. 91-358, title I, § 144(14)

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 15-711.
1973 Ed., § 15-711.